North Carolina, session 2025, HB451.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-375.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-375.3. Guidelines to support and assist students with diabetes.Diabetes support
and awareness.
(a) Local boards of education and boards of directors of charter schools Governing bodies
of public school units shall ensure that the guidelines adopted by the State Board of Education
under G.S. 115C-12(31) are implemented in schools in which students with diabetes are enrolled.
In particular, the boards governing bodies shall require the implementation of the procedures set
forth in those guidelines for the development and implementation of individual diabetes care
plans. The boards governing bodies also shall make available necessary information and staff
development to teachers and school personnel in order to appropriately support and assist
students with diabetes in accordance with their individual diabetes care plans.
(b) Governing bodies of public school units shall ensure that each school provides parents
and legal guardians with information about Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes at the beginning of every
school year. This information shall include all of the following:
(1) A description of Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes.
(2) A description of the risk factors and warning signs associated with Type 1 and
Type 2 diabetes.
(3) A recommendation that if a student is displaying warning signs associated
with diabetes, the parent or guardian of the student consult with the primary
care provider of the student to determine if immediate screening for diabetes
is appropriate.
(4) A description of the screening process for and stages of diabetes.
(5) A recommendation that if a student receives a diabetes diagnosis, the parent
or guardian of the student consult with the primary care provider of the student
to develop an appropriate treatment plan.
(6) Notification that the school is required to assist students with diabetes in
accordance with the guidelines adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(31)."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-150.12C(15) reads as rewritten:
"(15) Health and safety. – The board of trustees shall require that the school meet
the same health and safety standards required of a local school administrative
*H451-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
unit. The board shall comply with the requirements of Article 25A of this
Chapter, including the following:
a. The board shall ensure that the school provides parents with
information about cervical cancer, cervical dysplasia, human
papillomavirus, and the vaccines available to prevent these diseases.
This information shall be provided at the beginning of the school year
to parents of children entering grades five through 12. This
information shall include the causes and symptoms of these diseases,
how they are transmitted, how they may be prevented by vaccination,
including the benefits and possible side effects of vaccination, and
places parents may obtain additional information and vaccinations for
their children.
b. The board shall adopt policies to ensure that students in grades nine
through 12 receive information annually on the manner in which a
parent may lawfully abandon a newborn baby with a responsible
person, in accordance with G.S. 7B-500.
c. The board shall ensure that the school complies with G.S. 115C-375.3,
including the guidelines for individual diabetes care plans adopted by
the State Board of Education for assisting and supporting students
enrolled in the school with diabetes and the annual notification
requirements related to Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes awareness."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-238.66(7) reads as rewritten:
"(7) Health and safety. – The board of directors shall require that the regional
school meet the same health and safety standards required of a local school
administrative unit.unit, including the following:
a. The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that regional
schools comply with G.S. 115C-375.2A. The board of directors of a
regional school shall provide the school with a supply of emergency
epinephrine delivery systems necessary to carry out the provisions of
G.S. 115C-375.2A.
b. The board of directors shall ensure that the regional school complies
with G.S. 115C-375.3, including the guidelines for individual diabetes
care plans adopted by the State Board of Education for assisting and
supporting students enrolled in the school with diabetes and the annual
notification requirements related to Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes
awareness."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 116-239.8(b)(9) reads as rewritten:
"(9) Health and safety. – The chancellor shall require that the laboratory school
meet the same health and safety standards required of a local school
administrative unit.unit, including the following:
a. The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that laboratory
schools comply Chancellor shall ensure that the laboratory school
complies with G.S. 115C-375.2A. The chancellor shall provide the
laboratory school with a supply of emergency epinephrine delivery
systems necessary to carry out the provisions of G.S. 115C-375.2A.
b. The Chancellor shall ensure that the laboratory school complies with
G.S. 115C-375.3, including the guidelines for individual diabetes care
plans adopted by the State Board of Education for assisting and
supporting students enrolled in the school with diabetes and the annual
notification requirements related to Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes
awareness."
Page 2 House Bill 451-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to assist the Department in developing and distributing guidance to public
school units on implementing the provisions of this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 school year.
House Bill 451-Second Edition Page 3